Arkansas, session 2025, HB1860.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF ARKANSAS:

SECTION 1. Arkansas Code § 20-56-307 is amended to read as follows:
20-56-307. Visiting qualifying patient registry identification card.
A registry identification card for a visiting qualifying patient shall
be extended for a period of ninety (90) days valid for one (1) year from the
date of issuance.

SECTION 2. Arkansas Code Title 20, Chapter 56, Subchapter 3, is
amended to add additional sections to read as follows:
20-56-309. Qualifying patient registry identification card renewal.
(a) A qualifying patient registry identification card expires one (1)
year after issuance unless the certifying physician designates an earlier
*JMB410*
04-02-2025 10:54:04 JMB410

As Engrossed: H4/2/25 HB1860
expiration.
(b)(1) A qualifying patient may obtain a renewal of a qualifying
patient registry identification card by submitting a written request to the
Department of Health.
(2) The department shall not require an additional certification
from a certifying physician for a renewal of a qualifying patient registry
identification card.
(c)(1) After a qualifying patient registry identification card has
been renewed once, a new certification from a certifying physician shall be
submitted to obtain a new qualifying patient registry identification card.
(2) A new qualifying patient registry identification card under
subdivision (c)(1) of this section may be renewed as provided under
subdivision (b) of this section.
(d) The Department of Health may promulgate rules to implement this
section.

20-56-310. Universal registry identification card.
(a) An individual who is employed or provides services to a dispensary
or cultivation facility shall be issued a universal registry identification
card.
(b)(1) An individual holding a universal registry identification card
shall notify the Alcoholic Beverage Control Division in writing before
initiating employment or services to a dispensary or cultivation facility.
(2) The division shall maintain a record of each dispensary or
cultivation facility that is a designated facility of an individual holding a
universal registry identification card.
(c) The division may promulgate rules to implement this section.

/s/Duffield







04-02-2025 10:54:04 JMB410